Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1509
Environmental Quality Council; rules and regulations.

The Environmental Quality Council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Wellhead Protection Area Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 10.